Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-312
Inspections and examinations.

The engineer shall go over and inspect and examine the lands in the district, the railroad rights-of-way, roadbeds, bridges, culverts, depot grounds, grades, and all other railroad, telephone and telegraph property in the district. He shall inspect and examine all other improvements, streets, highways and bridges belonging to any county, municipal or other corporation which may be affected by the proposed drainage and reclamation works and improvements, and also the streams, watercourses, ditches, ponds, lakes and bayous within the district or partly within and partly without the district.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 9, p. 614;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 3, p. 509;

R.S.1913, § 1807;

C.S.1922, § 1754;

C.S.1929, § 31-411;

R.S.1943, § 31-312.

Inspection of lands affected was made. Petersen v. Thurston, 161 Neb. 758, 74 N.W.2d 528 (1956).